Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-905
Retirement board; duties.

It shall be the duty of the retirement board to:

(1) Determine the eligibility of an individual to be a member of the retirement system and other questions of fact in the event of dispute between an individual and a department;

(2) Adopt rules and regulations, as the board may deem necessary, for the management of the board;

(3) Prescribe the form in which employers report contributions, hours worked by school employees, payroll information, and other information necessary to carry out the board's duties;

(4) Keep a complete record of all proceedings taken at any meeting of the board;

(5) Employ an executive director and such assistants and employees as may be necessary in the performance of its duties; and

(6) Obtain actuarial services pursuant to subdivision (2)(e) of section 84-1503.

Laws 1967, c. 546, § 3, p. 1801;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 87, p. 2401;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 27;

Laws 1995, LB 502, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-1503.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 540;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 46;

Laws 2000, LB 1192, § 10;

Laws 2018, LB1005, § 21;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 16.
July 18, 2026